Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.250

Delivery by secretary of state.

Except as otherwise provided by RCW 23.95.450 or by law of this state other than this chapter, the secretary of state may deliver a record to a person by delivering it:

(1) In person to the person that submitted it for filing;

(2) To the address of the person's registered agent;

(3) To the principal office address of the person; or

(4) To another address the person provides to the secretary of state for delivery.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1211.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.